Maryland, session 2026, HB1238.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Finance and Procurement
7–332.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “FUND” MEANS THE MARYLAND STRATEGIC
INVESTMENT AND STABILIZATION FUND.
(B) THERE IS A MARYLAND STRATEGIC INVESTMENT AND STABILIZATION
FUND.

HOUSE BILL 1238 3
(C) THE PURPOSE OF THE FUND IS TO REDUCE THE STATE’S STRUCTURAL
BUDGET DEFICIT AND OFFSET REDUCTIONS IN OR LIMITATIONS ON FEDERAL
FUNDING FOR STATE–ADMINISTERED PROGRAMS.
(D) THE SECRETARY OF BUDGET AND MANAGEMENT SHALL ADMINISTER
THE FUND.
(E) (1) THE FUND IS A SPECIAL, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS NOT
SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(2) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL HOLD THE FUND SEPARATELY,
AND THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ACCOUNT FOR THE FUND.
(F) THE FUND CONSISTS OF:
(1) REVENUE DISTRIBUTED TO THE FUND FROM THE WEALTH TAX
IMPOSED UNDER SECTION 2 OF CHAPTER ____ (H.B. ___) (6LR3330) OF THE ACTS
OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF 2026;
(2) MONEY APPROPRIATED IN THE STATE BUDGET TO THE FUND; AND
(3) ANY OTHER MONEY FROM ANY OTHER SOURCE ACCEPTED FOR
THE BENEFIT OF THE FUND.
(G) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
THE FUND MAY BE USED ONLY TO REDUCE THE STATE’S STRUCTURAL BUDGET
DEFICIT AND OFFSET REDUCTIONS IN OR LIMITATIONS ON FEDERAL FUNDING FOR
STATE–ADMINISTERED PROGRAMS.
(2) FOR ANY FISCAL YEAR THAT THE FUND IS NOT NEEDED FOR THE
PURPOSES DESCRIBED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, AS CERTIFIED
BY THE BOARD OF REVENUE ESTIMATES, THE FUND MAY BE USED FOR:
(I) EDUCATION FUNDING AND IMPLEMENTATION OF THE
BLUEPRINT FOR MARYLAND’S FUTURE;
(II) BEHAVIORAL HEALTH WORKFORCE EXPANSION AND
COMMUNITY–BASED SERVICES;
(III) AFFORDABLE HOUSING AND CLIMATE–RESILIENT
INFRASTRUCTURE; AND
(IV) SMALL BUSINESS AND INNOVATION GRANTS.

HOUSE BILL 1238
(H) (1) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST THE MONEY OF THE FUND
IN THE SAME MANNER AS OTHER STATE MONEY MAY BE INVESTED.
(2) ANY INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND SHALL BE CREDITED TO
THE GENERAL FUND OF THE STATE.
(I) EXPENDITURES FROM THE FUND MAY BE MADE ONLY IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THE STATE BUDGET.
Article – Tax – General
10–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(B–1) “ASSETS” INCLUDES:
(1) PUBLICLY TRADED SECURITIES;
(2) PRIVATELY HELD BUSINESS INTERESTS;
(3) REAL PROPERTY;
(4) INTERESTS HELD IN TRUSTS;
(5) TANGIBLE PERSONAL PROPERTY; AND
(6) INTELLECTUAL PROPERTY.
(I–1) “NET WORTH” MEANS THE FAIR MARKET VALUE OF ALL ASSETS OWNED
OR CONTROLLED BY AN INDIVIDUAL LESS ALL LIABILITIES OF THE INDIVIDUAL.
(n) (1) “State income tax” means the State tax on income imposed under this
title.
(2) “STATE INCOME TAX” INCLUDES THE ULTRA–HIGH–NET–WORTH
INDIVIDUAL SURTAX.
(P) “ULTRA–HIGH–NET–WORTH INDIVIDUAL” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WITH
A WORLDWIDE NET WORTH THAT EXCEEDS $1,000,000,000 ON THE LAST DAY OF THE
TAXABLE YEAR.

HOUSE BILL 1238 5
(Q) “ULTRA–HIGH–NET–WORTH INDIVIDUAL SURTAX” MEANS THE SURTAX
IMPOSED UNDER § 10–102(B) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
10–102.
(A) Except as provided in § 10–104 of this subtitle, a tax is imposed on the
Maryland taxable income of each individual and of each corporation.
(B) IN ADDITION TO THE TAX IMPOSED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION, A SURTAX IS IMPOSED ON THE MARYLAND TAXABLE INCOME OF EACH
MARYLAND RESIDENT WHO IS AN ULTRA–HIGH–NET–WORTH INDIVIDUAL.
10–105.
(E) (1) (I) IN THIS SUBSECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE
MEANINGS INDICATED.
(II) “MARYLAND EFFECTIVE INCOME TAX RATE” MEANS THE
TOTAL AMOUNT OF STATE AND COUNTY INCOME TAX DUE FOR THE TAXABLE YEAR
DIVIDED BY THE TAXPAYER’S MARYLAND TAXABLE INCOME FOR THE TAXABLE
YEAR.
(III) “MARYLAND FAIR SHARE INCOME TAX RATE” MEANS THE
MEDIAN EFFECTIVE MARYLAND INCOME TAX RATE PAID BY ALL MARYLAND
RESIDENTS FOR THE MOST RECENT TAXABLE YEAR FOR WHICH DATA IS AVAILABLE.
(2) (I) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 31 EACH YEAR, THE
COMPTROLLER SHALL DETERMINE AND PUBLISH ON THE COMPTROLLER’S
WEBSITE THE MARYLAND FAIR SHARE INCOME TAX RATE FOR THE NEXT YEAR.
(II) THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS THAT
SPECIFY HOW THE MARYLAND FAIR SHARE INCOME TAX RATE IS DETERMINED.
(3) THE ULTRA–HIGH–NET–WORTH INDIVIDUAL SURTAX RATE IS
EQUAL TO THE MARYLAND FAIR SHARE INCOME TAX RATE MINUS THE
ULTRA–HIGH–NET–WORTH INDIVIDUAL’S MARYLAND EFFECTIVE INCOME TAX
RATE.
10–601.
Except as provided in § 10–105(d) of this title and except as otherwise provided in
this subtitle, a person shall compute the State income tax by applying the tax rates in §
10–105 of this title to Maryland taxable income.

HOUSE BILL 1238
10–831.
(A) THE COMPTROLLER MAY REQUIRE A RESIDENT TO FILE WITH THE
RESIDENT’S INCOME TAX RETURN A NET WORTH DISCLOSURE STATEMENT
CONTAINING THE INFORMATION THE COMPTROLLER REQUIRES FOR THE PURPOSE
OF DETERMINING APPLICABILITY OF THE ULTRA–HIGH–NET–WORTH INDIVIDUAL
SURTAX.
(B) (1) THE COMPTROLLER MAY EVALUATE ANY TRANSFER OF ASSETS
BY A RESIDENT THAT OCCURS WITHIN 2 YEARS OF THE START OF A TAXABLE YEAR
TO DETERMINE WHETHER THE TRANSFER WAS FOR THE SOLE PURPOSE OF
AVOIDING THE ULTRA–HIGH–NET–WORTH INDIVIDUAL SURTAX.
(2) IF THE COMPTROLLER DETERMINES THAT THE TRANSFER UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION IS FOR THE SOLE PURPOSE OF AVOIDING THE
ULTRA–HIGH–NET–WORTH INDIVIDUAL SURTAX, THE ULTRA–HIGH–NET–WORTH
INDIVIDUAL SURTAX SHALL BE IMPOSED ON THE MARYLAND TAXABLE INCOME OF
THE RESIDENT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Assets” include:
(i) publicly traded securities;
(ii) privately held business interests;
(iii) real property;
(iv) interests held in trusts;
(v) tangible personal property; and
(vi) intellectual property.
(3) “Net worth” means the fair market value of all assets owned or
controlled by an individual less all liabilities of the individual.
(4) “Resident” has the meaning stated in § 10–101 of the Tax – General
Article.
(b) (1) A one–time wealth tax is imposed on the value of the assets of a resident
who has a net worth in excess of $1,000,000,000 on the valuation date.

HOUSE BILL 1238 7
(2) The valuation date for the tax imposed under this subsection is January
1, 2027, or any other date the Comptroller designates by regulation.
(c) The tax rate for the tax imposed under this section is:
(1) 3% of the amount by which the net worth of a resident exceeds
$1,000,000,000 but does not exceed $2,500,000,000;
(2) 5% of the amount by which the net worth of a resident exceeds
$2,500,000,000 but does not exceed $5,000,000,000; and
(3) 6% of the amount by which the net worth of a resident exceeds
$5,000,000,000.
(d) (1) A resident may pay the tax imposed under this section in equal
installments over a period not to exceed 5 years.
(2) The Comptroller shall set a reasonable interest rate for a resident that
elects to pay the tax in installment payments.
(e) The Comptroller shall distribute the revenue from the tax imposed under this
section to the Maryland Strategic Investment and Stabilization Fund established in §
7–332 of the State Finance and Procurement Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act.
(f) (1) The Comptroller shall adopt regulations for the calculation,
administration, collection, and enforcement of the tax imposed under this section.
(2) The regulations shall establish uniform valuation standards for assets.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026, and Section 1 of this Act shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after
December 31, 2027. Section 2 of this Act shall remain effective for a period of 6 years and,
at the end of June 30, 2032, Section 2 of this Act, with no further action required by the
General Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.